Hawaii statutes.
§431:7-205 Reports to department of
taxation. The commissioner shall promptly report to the department of
taxation all amounts of taxes collected under section 431:7-201 to section
431:7-204 and section 431:8-315 and all amounts of refunds of such taxes made
under section 431:7-203. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next